Wisconsin, session 2025, AB971.
do enact as follows:AB971,11Section 1. 39.378 (1) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 35, is 2renumbered 39.378 (1) (intro.) and amended to read:AB971,2,4339.378 (1) (intro.) The board shall develop a program to reimburse do all of 4the following:AB971,2,75(a) Reimburse the persons described under sub. (2) for the tuition and 6materials costs incurred in completing a program at a technical college in this state 7as necessary to qualify for initial licensure or initial certification.AB971,28Section 2. 39.378 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB971,2,11939.378 (1) (b) Reimburse the persons described under sub. (2m) for the tuition 10and materials costs incurred in completing a program as necessary to qualify for 11approval by the department of health services.AB971,312Section 3. 39.378 (2m) and (3m) of the statutes are created to read:AB971,2,141339.378 (2m) The following persons are eligible for reimbursement under this 14section:AB971,2,1715(a) An individual who is applying for approval as a community paramedic 16under s. 256.205 if the individual has personally paid the tuition or materials costs 17for the program.AB971,2,2018(b) An individual who is applying for approval as a community emergency 19medical services practitioner under s. 256.21 if the individual has personally paid 20the tuition or materials costs for the program.AB971,3,21(c) The employer of an individual listed under par. (a) or (b) if the employer 2has paid for the applicant’s cost of tuition or materials for the program.AB971,3,43(3m) To be eligible for reimbursement under this section, a person described 4under sub. (2m) shall satisfy the following criteria:AB971,3,85(a) For individuals described under sub. (2m) (a), the individual has 6satisfactorily completed a community paramedic training program under s. 256.205 7(3) and has received approval by the department of health services as a community 8paramedic under s. 256.205.AB971,3,139(b) For individuals described under sub. (2m) (b), the individual has 10satisfactorily completed a community emergency medical services practitioner 11training program under s. 256.21 (3) and has received approval by the department 12of health services as a community emergency medical services practitioner under s. 13256.21.AB971,3,1614(c) For employers who have paid for an individual’s costs of tuition or 15materials as described under sub. (2m) (c), the individual satisfies the criteria 16under par. (a) or (b).AB971,417Section 4. 39.378 (4) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 35, is 18amended to read:AB971,3,221939.378 (4) To receive reimbursement under this section, persons described 20under sub. (2) who are eligible for reimbursement under sub. (3) and persons 21described under sub. (2m) who are eligible for reimbursement under sub. (3m) shall 22apply to the board for reimbursement on a form prescribed by the board.AB971,3,2323